Utah statutes.
4-24-20.   Livestock sold at market to be brand inspected -- Proceeds of sale may be withheld -- Distribution of withheld proceeds -- Effect of receipt of proceeds by department -- Deposit of proceeds -- Use of proceeds if ownership not established.

(1)  Livestock may not be sold at any livestock market until after they have been brand inspected by the department.  Title to purchased livestock shall be furnished to the buyer by the livestock market.

(2)  Upon notice from the department that a question exists concerning the ownership of consigned livestock, the operator of the livestock market or meat packing plant shall withhold the proceeds from the sale of the livestock for 60 days to allow the consignor of the questioned livestock to establish ownership.  If the owner or consignor fails within 60 days to establish ownership to the satisfaction of the department, the proceeds of the sale shall be transmitted to the department.  Receipt of the proceeds by the department shall relieve the livestock market or meat packing plant from further responsibility for the proceeds.

(3)  Proceeds withheld under Subsection (2) shall be deposited in the Utah Livestock Brand and Anti-Theft Account created in Section 4-24-24.  If ownership is not satisfactorily established within one year, the department shall use the proceeds for animal identification.

